nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Deler og tilbehør for kunstløp > Skøyteblader: Kunstskøytestål; Skøytestål for keepere; Hockeyskøytestål; Hurtigløpsskøytestål
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ πατινάζ πάγου > Λεπίδες παγοπέδιλων: Λεπίδες για παγοπέδιλα καλλιτεχνικού πατινάζ; Λεπίδες για παγοπέδιλα τερματοφύλακα; Λεπίδες για παγοπέδιλα χόκεϊ; Λεπίδες για παγοπέδιλα ταχύτητας
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 溜冰鞋零件/配件 > 冰刀鞋用冰刀: 花式滑冰鞋冰刀; 守門員溜冰鞋冰刀; 冰球鞋冰刀; 競速滑冰鞋冰刀
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Schaatsonderdelen en -accessoires > Schaatsijzers: Kunstschaatsijzers; Schaatsijzers voor keepers; IJshockeyschaatsijzers; Norenijzers
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Ice Skate Parts & Accessories > Ice Skate Blades: Figure Skate Blades; Goalie Skate Blades; Hockey Skate Blades; Speed Skate Blades
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Phụ tùng và phụ kiện giày trượt băng > Lưỡi giày trượt băng: Lưỡi giày trượt băng nghệ thuật; Lưỡi giày trượt thủ môn; Lưỡi giày trượt khúc côn cầu; Lưỡi giày trượt tốc độ
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Díly a příslušenství k bruslím > Nože pro brusle: Nože pro krasobruslařské brusle; Nože pro brankářské brusle; Nože pro hokejové brusle; Nože pro rychlobruslařské brusle
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Časti a príslušenstvo pre korčule > Čepele na korčule: Čepele na krasokorčuliarske korčule; Brankárske korčule; Čepele na hokejové korčule; Čepele na rýchlokorčuliarske korčule
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰刀/冰鞋零件/配件 > 冰刀: 花样滑冰鞋冰刀; 守门员冰鞋冰刀; 冰球鞋冰刀; 速度滑冰鞋冰刀
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Dele og tilbehør til skøjter > Isskøjteklinger: Klinger til kunstskøjter; Klinger til målmandsskøjter; Klinger til hockeyskøjter; Klinger til hurtigløbsskøjter
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Schlittschuhzubehör > Schlittschuhkufen: Eiskunstlauf-Kufen; Torwart-Kufen; Eishockey-Kufen; Eisschnelllauf-Kufen
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Delar och tillbehör för skridskoåkning > Skridskoskenor: Konståkningsskenor; Skridskoskenor för målvakter; Skridskoskenor för ishockey; Hastighetsskenor för skridskor
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Części i akcesoria do łyżew > Płozy łyżew: Płozy do łyżew figurowych; Płozy do łyżew bramkarskich; Płozy do łyżew hokejowych; Płozy do łyżew do jazdy szybkiej
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 스케이트 부품/부대용품 > 스케이트날: 피겨 스케이트 블레이드; 골리 스케이트 블레이드; 하키 스케이트 블레이드; 스피드 스케이트 블레이드
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Детали и аксессуары для коньков > Лезвия для коньков: Лезвия для фигурных коньков; Лезвия для вратарских коньков; Лезвия для хоккейных коньков; Лезвия для конькобежных коньков
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Accesorios para patines de hielo > Cuchillas para patines de hielo: Cuchillas para patines de patinaje artístico; Cuchillas para patines de portero; Cuchillas para patines de hockey; Cuchillas para patines de velocidad
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Pačiūžų dalys ir priedai > Pačiūžų ašmenys: Dailiojo čiuožimo pačiūžų geležtės; Vartininko pačiūžų peiliai; Ledo ritulio pačiūžų geležtės; Greitojo čiuožimo pačiūžų geležtės
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Buz Pateni Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Buz Pateni Bıçakları: Artistik paten bıçakları; Kaleci pateni bıçakları; Hokey pateni bıçakları; Hız pateni bıçakları
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Dijelovi i pribor za klizanje na ledu > Oštrice klizaljki: Oštrice za umjetničko klizanje; Oštrice za klizaljke vratara; Oštrice za klizaljke za hokej; Oštrice za brzo klizanje
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイススケート靴パーツ・関連用品 > アイススケート用ブレード: フィギュアスケートブレード; ゴーリースケートブレード; ホッケースケートブレード; スピードスケートブレード
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Luistinten osat ja tarvikkeet > Luistinten terät: Taitoluistinten terät; Maalivahdin luistinten terät; Jääkiekkoluistinten terät; Pikaluistinten terät
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Acessórios e peças para patins de gelo > Lâminas para patins de gelo: Lâminas de patins de patinagem artística; Lâminas de patins de guarda-redes; Lâminas de patins de hóquei; Lâminas de patins de velocidade
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorcsolya-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Jégkorcsolyapengék: Műkorcsolya-pengék; Kapuskorcsolya-pengék; Jégkorongkorcsolya-pengék; Gyorskorcsolya-pengék
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Pièces et accessoires de patins à glace > Lames de patins à glace: Lames de patins artistiques; Lames de patins de gardien de but; Lames de patins de hockey; Lames de patins de vitesse
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สเก็ตน้ำแข็ง > เบลดสำหรับสเกตน้ำแข็ง: ใบมีดรองเท้าฟิกเกอร์สเกต; ใบมีดรองเท้าสเกตโกล; ใบมีดรองเท้าสเกตฮอกกี้; ใบมีดรองเท้าสปีดสเกต
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Deli in dodatki za drsalke > Rezila za drsalke: Rezila za drsalke za umetnostno drsanje; Rezila za drsalke za vratarje; Rezila za drsalke za hokej; Rezila za drsalke za hitrostno drsanje
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Componenti e accessori per pattinaggio su ghiaccio > Lame per pattini da ghiaccio: Lame per pattini da figura; Lame per pattini da portiere; Lame per pattini da hockey; Lame per pattini da velocità
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Piese și accesorii pentru patinaj pe gheață > Lame pentru patinaj pe gheață: Lame pentru patine de patinaj artistic; Lame pentru patinele de portar; Lame pentru patine de hochei; Lame pentru patine de patinaj viteză
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Peças e acessórios para patins para gelo > Lâminas de patins para gelo: Lâminas de patins artísticos; Lâminas de patins de goleiro; Lâminas de patins de hóquei; Lâminas de patins de velocidade
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Части и аксесоари за кънки на лед > Остриета за кънки на лед: Остриета за кънки за фигурно пързаляне; Вратарски остриета за кънки; Остриета за кънки за хокей; Остриета за скоростни кънки